Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 5

Greenmail Act

48-103-501. Short title — Applicability.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Greenmail Act.”

The requirements of this part shall be applicable to any corporation chartered under the laws of Tennessee which has a class of voting stock registered or traded on a national securities exchange or registered with the securities and exchange commission pursuant to § 12(g) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 781l (g)),as amended.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 27; T.C.A., § 48-35-501.

Cross-References. Securities law, title 48, ch. 1.

Tennessee Authorized Corporation Protection Act, title 48, ch. 103, part 4.

Tennessee Business Combination Act, title 48, ch. 103, part 2.

Tennessee Control Share Acquisition Act, title 48, ch. 103, part 3.

48-103-502. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Associate,” when used to indicate a relationship with any person, means:

A person that, directly or indirectly, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with, the person specified or who is or intends to act jointly or in concert with such specified person;

Any corporation or organization of which such person is an officer, director or partner or which corporation or organization is, directly or indirectly, the beneficial owner of ten percent (10%) or more of any class of equity securities of such person;

Any trust or other estate in which such person has a beneficial interest or as to which such person serves as trustee or in a similar fiduciary capacity; and

Any parent, child, sibling, in-law (mother, father, sons and daughters), of such person, or any relative of such person who has the same residence as such person;

“Control” means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a person whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, unincorporated association or other entity and any “associate” (as defined in subdivision (1)) of such individual or entity; and

“Subsidiary” means any corporation in which a majority of the shares entitled to vote are owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by a corporation subject to this part.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 30; T.C.A., § 48-35-502.

48-103-503. Corporation's purchase of own shares at price above market value.

It is unlawful for any corporation subject to this part, including any subsidiary of such corporation, to purchase, directly or indirectly, any of its shares at a price above the market value of such shares from any person who holds more than three percent (3%) of the class of the securities to be purchased if such person has held such shares for less than two (2) years, unless such purchase has been approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares of each class of voting stock issued by such corporation or the corporation makes an offer, of at least equal value per share, to all holders of shares of such class.

For the purposes of this section, the market value of such shares shall be the average of the highest and lowest closing market price for such shares during the thirty (30) trading days preceding the purchase and sale of the shares subject to this section; provided, that if the seller of such shares has commenced a tender offer or has announced an intention to seek control of the corporation, such market price shall be based upon the average of the highest and lowest closing price for such shares during the thirty (30) trading days preceding the commencement of such tender offer or the making of such announcement.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 28; T.C.A., § 48-35-503.

48-103-504. Action against seller — Attorney's fees.

Any person who sells securities to a corporation or any subsidiary of such corporation in violation of this part shall be liable to the corporation for damages equal to two (2) times the amount by which the aggregate sum paid for the purchase of such shares exceeds the maximum amount otherwise permitted to be paid for such shares under this part; provided, that a civil action is instituted for the recovery thereof in a court of competent jurisdiction within two (2) years of such sale.

Reasonable attorneys' fees may be granted, at the discretion of the court, to the prevailing party in any civil action instituted under this section if the court finds that the action was either instituted without good faith or that the sale of securities was undertaken with intentional or reckless indifference to the requirements of this part.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 29; T.C.A., § 48-35-504.

48-103-505. Severability — Construction with other laws.

If any clause, sentence, subparagraph, paragraph, subsection, section, article or other portion of this part or the application thereof to any person or circumstances shall be held invalid, such holding shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder of this part or parts 2-4 of this chapter or the application of such portion held invalid to any other person or circumstances, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, subparagraph, paragraph, subsection, section, article or other portion thereof directly involved in such holding or to the person or circumstances therein involved.

If any provision of this part is inconsistent with, in conflict with, or contrary to any other provision of Tennessee law, such provision of this part shall prevail over such other provision and such other provision shall be deemed to be amended, superseded or repealed to the extent of such inconsistency or conflict.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 31; T.C.A., § 48-35-505.

Chapters 104-200

[Reserved]